Wyoming, session 2026, HB0105.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) This section shall consist of funds appropriated
for K-12 school building and facility needs.
(b) As used in this section, a "priority" identified
by an Arabic numeral means the project ranking as submitted
by the school facilities commission within its budget
recommendations provided under W.S. 21-15-119.
(c) Except as specifically provided in this
subsection, subsection (d) of this section or as otherwise
provided by law, the amounts appropriated from the public
school foundation program account under subsection (j) of
this section are for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and
ending upon project completion. Appropriations for
projects denoted with an asterisk (*) within subsection (j)
of this section are effective immediately, and end upon
project completion, unless otherwise provided by law. Upon
completion of a project under this subsection, any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from the
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
appropriation for the project shall revert to the public
school foundation program account.
(d) The amounts appropriated from the public school
foundation program account under paragraphs (j)(ii) and
(iv) of this section are for the period beginning July 1,
2026 and ending June 30, 2028. Any unexpended, unobligated
funds remaining from any of these appropriations shall
revert to the public school foundation program account on
June 30, 2028, unless otherwise provided by law.
(e) As authorized under W.S. 21-15-119(a)(iii), the
school facilities commission may submit a supplemental
budget request for the period beginning July 1, 2027 and
ending June 30, 2028, for any emergency or unanticipated
need, or for any refinement or modification of a project
funded under this section, subject to any constraints or
other requirements imposed by the governor under W.S.
9-2-1013.
(f) An estimated schedule for deploying projects
funded by amounts appropriated under subsection (j) of this
section, as adopted by the school facilities commission and
as contained within the 2027-2028 biennial budget submitted
by the commission under W.S. 21-15-119, shall be used by
the state construction department to the extent practicable
to guide expenditure of appropriated funds. The estimated
schedule shall be based upon information, processes, events
and expenditures and shall not be binding upon the state
construction department or the school facilities
commission.
(g) Amounts appropriated under subsection (j) of this
section shall not be construed to be an entitlement or
guaranteed amount and shall be expended by the school
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
facilities commission to ensure adequate, efficient and
cost effective school buildings and facilities in
accordance with W.S. 21-15-114(a)(vii).
(h) In addition to accounting and reporting
requirements imposed under W.S. 28-11-301(c)(iv), the state
construction department shall report at least one (1) time
each year on the deployment of amounts to fund projects
under this section in accordance with the deployment
schedule, information on project progression and, if
applicable, the rationale for any deviation from the
estimated schedule. The reports, as approved by the
commission, shall be submitted by the department to the
select committee on school facilities, the joint
appropriations committee and the governor.
(j) For K-12 school facility projects, the following
amounts are appropriated from the public school foundation
program account to the school facilities commission for the
following purposes:
(i) For component level major maintenance
projects, thirty-one million six hundred sixty-one thousand
three hundred twenty-two dollars ($31,661,322.00). The
school facilities commission may modify prioritization of
projects contained in this paragraph to optimize efficiency
or based on project readiness. Expenditure of funds
appropriated by this paragraph shall be subject to the
following prescribed maximum amounts:
School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount
04-01 Big Horn #3 High School $828,878*
04-02 Johnson #1 High School $3,137,677*
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
04-03 Sheridan #2 Junior High School $2,593,497*
04-04 Laramie #2 Administration Building $114,196*
04-05 Fremont #14 Middle School $1,456,696*
04-06 Hot Springs #1 Elementary School $948,168*
04-07 Converse #2 Junior High/High School $1,756,228*
04-08 Big Horn #1 Elementary School $173,963*
04-09 Crook #1 K-12 School $610,461*
04-10 Carbon #1 Middle School $1,880,657*
04-11 Sublette #1 High School $1,878,241*
04-12 Weston #7 High School $833,192*
04-13 Washakie #1 Middle School $1,799,497*
04-14 Lincoln #1 Elementary School $3,296,500*
04-15 Weston #1 High School $4,703,382*
04-16 Big Horn #2 High School $1,988,099*
04-17 Carbon #2 Junior High/High School $808,866*
04-18 Fremont #6 Middle School $244,378*
04-19 Park #16 K-12 School $2,608,746*
04-20 Big Horn #3 Elementary School $ 531,164*
04-21 Johnson #1 K-12 School $ 1,428,703*
04-22 Fremont #14 Middle School $ 1,287,903*
(ii) For charter school leases, six million
three hundred thirty-two thousand nine hundred twenty-eight
dollars ($6,332,928.00). The funds appropriated under this
paragraph shall be distributed for charter school lease
expenses for school year 2026-2027 and school year
2027-2028, are subject to W.S. 21-3-110(a)(x) and shall be
subject to the following prescribed maximum amounts:
School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount
05-01 Albany #1 Elementary School $347,799
05-02 Laramie #1 Elementary School $830,585
05-03 Laramie #1 Secondary School $916,645
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
05-04 Natrona #1 K-8 School $1,823,257
05-05 Laramie #1 Elementary School $1,253,600
05-06 Lincoln #2 Elementary School $416,150
05-07 Platte #1 K-12 School $744,892
Total $ 6,332,928
(iii) Subject to the requirements of W.S.
21-3-110(a)(x), for future charter school leasing
obligations (priority 07-01), one million seven hundred
ninety-two thousand nine hundred seventy-six dollars
($1,792,976.00). The funds appropriated under this
paragraph shall only be expended for leasing expenses for
charter schools approved for operation pursuant to W.S.
21-3-301 et seq. The funds appropriated under this
paragraph shall be separately accounted and the
appropriation shall remain in effect and not lapse or
revert at the end of the fiscal period except upon further
legislative action. In addition to any other reporting
requirements, not later than September 1, 2026 and each
September 1 thereafter until all funds appropriated under
this paragraph are expended, the state construction
department shall report expenditures of funds under this
paragraph to the select committee on school facilities, the
joint appropriations committee and the governor;
(iv) For modular buildings and leases, fifty-two
thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars ($52,125.00),
subject to the following prescribed maximum amounts:
School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount
06-01 Laramie #1 Modular Lease $17,375
06-02 Laramie #1 Modular Lease $17,375
06-03 Laramie #1 Modular Lease $17,375
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Total $52,125
(v) For design of school building and facility
projects, fifteen million seven hundred thirty-nine
thousand eight hundred fifty-five dollars ($15,739,855.00),
subject to the following prescribed maximum amounts:
School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount
09-01 Teton #1 High School $2,809,810*
09-02 Crook #1 Secondary School $1,710,957
09-03 Laramie #1 High School $4,346,602
09-04 Laramie #1 Elementary School $3,675,736
09-05 Fremont #25 Elementary School $3,196,750
Total $15,739,855
(vi) For construction of school building and
facility projects, seventy-seven million three hundred
fifty-nine thousand seven hundred thirty-one dollars
($77,359,731.00), subject to the following prescribed
maximum amounts:
School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount
10-01 Crook #1 Secondary School $12,632,827
10-02 Laramie #1 Elementary School $1,494,000
10-03 Laramie #1 Elementary School $33,298,901
10-04 Fremont #25 Elementary School $29,934,003
Total $77,359,731
(vii) For demolition projects, two million six
hundred twenty thousand six hundred seventy dollars
($2,620,670.00), subject to the following prescribed
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
maximum amounts:
School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount
11-01 Laramie #1 Elementary School $1,286,510*
11-02 Albany #1 Elementary School $500,000
11-03 Laramie #1 Elementary School $834,160
Total $2,620,670
(viii) For unanticipated costs associated with
the projects funded under paragraphs (j)(i) and (v) through
(vii) of this section (priority 12-01), seven million six
hundred forty-two thousand eight hundred ninety-five
dollars ($7,642,895.00).
(ix) To supplement previous appropriations for
the construction and demolition of a transportation
facility ancillary building in Campbell county school
district #1 authorized under 2025 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 118, Section 1(g)(ii)(A), two million six hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($2,650,000.00)*, effective
immediately. The original scope and design of the project
shall not be modified as a result of the additional funds
appropriated under this paragraph. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation and previous
appropriations for this project be prioritized by the
school facilities commission to ensure the expenditures for
this project result in an adequate, efficient and cost
effective project in accordance with W.S. 21-15-
114(a)(vii).
Section 2.
(a) For K-12 school facility safety and security
7

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
projects, ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) is
appropriated to the school facilities commission, from the
public school foundation program account, for design of
security vestibules and vehicle barricades and approved
prioritized school district safety and security remedies.
The funds appropriated under this subsection shall remain
in effect beginning July 1, 2026, until the project is
completed, unless otherwise provided by law. Upon
completion of a remedy under this section, any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation for the
remedy shall revert to the public school foundation program
account.
(b) The school facilities commission shall establish
a prioritized list of K-12 school facility safety and
security remedies utilizing national and regional best
practices. The commission shall consider school safety and
security needs identified by school districts in
determining the prioritized list of remedies. Funds shall
be distributed to school districts upon application to the
state construction department, in the manner and form
required by the commission, and as approved by the
commission.
(c) Prior to the expenditure of funds appropriated by
subsection (a) of this section, for each safety and
security remedy, the commission shall include the remedy in
the school district facility plan required pursuant to W.S.
21-15-116, ensure the remedy is a cost effective method to
address the safety and security need and specify a maximum
budget for each remedy.
(d) Not later than September 1, 2026, and each
September 1 thereafter until the funds appropriated under
subsection (a) of this section are expended or have
8

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
reverted upon completion of a remedy, in conjunction with
the school facilities commission's annual budget
recommendations required pursuant to W.S. 21-15-119, the
commission and state construction department shall report
to the select committee on school facilities, the joint
appropriations committee and the governor any expenditures
of funds appropriated under subsection (a) of this section
and shall include any request for funds necessary for the
construction of security vestibules and vehicle barriers
and to complete school district safety and security needs
identified pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
Section 3.
(a) There is appropriated two hundred thirty-seven
million eight hundred sixty-five thousand one hundred
twenty-three dollars ($237,865,123.00) from the public
school foundation program account to the state construction
department for major maintenance payments to school
districts in accordance with W.S. 21-15-109. This
appropriation shall be subject to the following:
(i) One million one hundred twenty-two thousand
four hundred dollars ($1,122,400.00) shall be for the
period beginning on the effective date of this section and
ending June 30, 2028;
(ii) Two hundred thirty-six million seven
hundred forty-two thousand seven hundred twenty-three
dollars ($236,742,723.00) shall be for the period beginning
July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028;
(iii) This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
9

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0105
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028.
Section 4. To the extent that 2026 Senate File 0060
is enacted into law during the 2026 Budget Session, the
provisions of this act shall control and supersede any
conflicting provisions of 2026 Senate File 0060.
Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
10